Hawaii statutes.
§606-3 Seal of court; physical or
electronic seal, signature, or attestation on physical or electronic court
records. (a) Each court of record shall have a seal, which shall be as
approved by the supreme court. The seal shall be in the custody or control of
the clerk of the court and, when impressed, embossed, stamped, or
electronically imprinted upon a court document, process, or certificate, shall
be accompanied by the clerk's official attestation.

(b) Any requirement that a court document,
process, or certificate shall be signed, certified, acknowledged, verified,
exemplified, attested, or made under oath or seal is satisfied if the document
bears an electronic seal of the court and an electronic image of the signature
or electronic facsimile signature of the judge, clerk, or other person
authorized to perform these acts. [L 1892, c 57, §65; RL 1925, §2293; RL 1935,
§3692; RL 1945, §9723; RL 1955, §218-3; HRS §606-3; am L 1972, c 88, §4(c); am
L 2006, c 284, §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next